North Carolina, session 2025, HB804.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. TITLE
SECTION 1.1. This act shall be known as "The Human Life Protection Act of 2025."

PART II. PROHIBITION ON ABORTION
SECTION 2.1. Article 11 of Chapter 14 of the General Statutes is amended by
adding a new section to read:
"§ 14-45.2. Abortion prohibited.
(a) Definitions. – The following definitions apply in this section:
(1) Abortion. – The act of using or prescribing an instrument, a drug, a medicine,
or any other substance, device, or means with the intent to cause the death of
an unborn child of a woman known to be pregnant. This term does not include
birth control devices or oral contraceptives. An act is not an abortion if the act
is done with the intent to do any of the following:
a. Save the life or preserve the health of an unborn child.
b. Remove a dead, unborn child whose death was caused by spontaneous
abortion.
c. Remove an ectopic pregnancy.
(2) Fertilization. – The point in time when a male human sperm penetrates the
zona pellucida of a female human ovum.
(3) Pregnant. – The female human reproductive condition of having a living
unborn child within the female's body during the entire embryonic and fetal
stages of the unborn child's development from fertilization until birth.
(4) Reasonable medical judgment. – A medical judgment made by a reasonably
prudent physician, knowledgeable about a case and the treatment possibilities
for the medical conditions involved.
(5) Unborn child. – An individual living member of the homo sapiens species
from fertilization until birth, including the entire embryonic and fetal stages
of development.
(b) Prohibition. – Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person
shall not knowingly perform, induce, or attempt an abortion.
*H804-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) Exception to Prohibition. – The prohibition in subsection (b) of this section does not
apply if all of the following requirements are met:
(1) The person performing, inducing, or attempting the abortion is a licensed
physician.
(2) In the exercise of reasonable medical judgment, the pregnant female on whom
the abortion is performed, induced, or attempted has a life-threatening
physical condition aggravated by, caused by, or arising from a pregnancy that
places the female at risk of death or poses a serious risk of substantial
impairment of a major bodily function unless the abortion is performed or
induced. The requirement set forth in this subdivision does not include any
situation where the risk of death or substantial impairment of a major bodily
function arose from a claim or diagnosis that the female would engage in
conduct that may result in the female's death or in substantial impairment of a
major bodily function.
(3) The person performs, induces, or attempts the abortion in a manner that, in the
exercise of reasonable medical judgment, provides the best opportunity for the
unborn child to survive unless, in the reasonable medical judgment, that
manner would create either of the following:
a. A greater risk of the pregnant female's death.
b. A serious risk of substantial impairment of a major bodily function of
the pregnant female.
(d) Accidental or Unintentional Death. – Medical treatment provided to a pregnant
female by a licensed physician that results in the accidental or unintentional injury or death of an
unborn child does not constitute a violation of subsection (b) of this section.
(e) Criminal Punishment. – A violation of subsection (b) of this section that results in the
death of an unborn child is a Class B1 felony. Any other violation of subsection (b) of this section
is a Class B2 felony.
(f) Civil Penalty. – A person who violates subsection (b) of this section is subject to a
civil penalty of not less than one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) for each violation. The
Attorney General shall file an action to recover a civil penalty assessed under this subsection and
may recover attorneys' fees and costs incurred in bringing the action. The clear proceeds of civil
penalties provided for in this section shall be remitted to the Civil Penalty and Forfeiture Fund
in accordance with G.S. 115C-457.2.
(g) Disciplinary Action. – In addition to any other penalty that may be imposed under
this section, the appropriate licensing authority shall revoke the license, permit, registration,
certificate, or other authority of a physician or other health care professional who performs,
induces, or attempts an abortion in violation of subsection (b) of this section.
(h) Civil Remedies Unaffected. – The fact that conduct is subject to a civil or criminal
penalty under this section does not abolish or impair any remedy for the conduct that is available
in a civil suit.
(i) Construction. – This section shall not be construed to authorize the imposition of
criminal, civil, or administrative liability or penalties on a pregnant female on whom an abortion
is performed, induced, or attempted."
SECTION 2.2. This Part only applies to abortions performed, induced, or attempted
on or after the effective date of this Part.

PART III. CONFORMING CHANGES
SECTION 3.1. G.S. 14-44 and G.S. 14-45 are repealed.
SECTION 3.2. G.S. 14-23.7 reads as rewritten:
"§ 14-23.7. Exceptions.
Page 2 House Bill 804-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Nothing in this Article shall be construed to permit the prosecution under this Article of any
of the following:
(1) Acts which cause the death of an unborn child if those acts were lawful,
pursuant to the provisions of Article 1I of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes.G.S. 14-45.2.
…
(3) Acts committed by a pregnant woman with respect to her own unborn child,
including, but not limited to, acts which result in miscarriage or stillbirth by
the woman. The following definitions shall apply in this section:
a. Miscarriage. – The interruption of the normal development of an
unborn child, other than by a live birth, and which is not an induced
abortion permitted under Article 1I of Chapter 90 of the General
Statutes, G.S. 14-45.2, resulting in the complete expulsion or
extraction from a pregnant woman of the unborn child.
b. Stillbirth. – The death of an unborn child prior to the complete
expulsion or extraction from a woman, irrespective of the duration of
pregnancy and which is not an induced abortion permitted under
Article 1I of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes.G.S. 14-45.2."
SECTION 3.3. G.S. 131E-269 is repealed.
SECTION 3.4. G.S. 131E-272 reads as rewritten:
"§ 131E-272. Initial licensure fees for new facilities.
The following fees are initial licensure fees for new facilities and are applicable as follows:
Number Initial Initial
Facility Type of Beds License Fee Bed Fee
…
Abortion Clinics - $850.00 $ -
…."
SECTION 3.5. Article 1I of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 3.6. Article 1K of Chapter 90 of the General Statutes is repealed.
SECTION 3.7. Part 4A of Article 6 of Chapter 131E of the General Statutes is
repealed.
SECTION 3.8. This Part only applies to abortions performed, induced, or attempted
on or after the effective date of this Part.

PART IV. SEVERABILITY AND EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 4.1. If any provision of this act or its application is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of this act that can be given effect
without the invalid provisions or application and, to this end, the provisions of this act are
severable.
SECTION 4.2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 804-First Edition Page 3